California, session 20252026, AB1618.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9.7 (commencing with Section 18750) is added to Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 9.7. Food Insecurity Survey18750. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) ”Department” “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.(b) “Food insecurity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 18700. 18751. (a) The department shall annually conduct a statewide survey to assess food insecurity in the state, modeled after the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Economic Research Service national household food security survey. The department’s first statewide food insecurity survey shall be completed on or before July 1, 2027. 2028.(b) On or before October 1, 2028. and annually thereafter, the department shall make the results of the statewide food insecurity survey publicly available on its internet website.(c) The department may collaborate or contract with a public research institution or other external vendor to implement subdivisions (a) and (b).18752.On or before October 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall make the results of the statewide food insecurity survey publicly available on its internet website. 18753.18752. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 18751, the department shall not conduct a statewide food insecurity survey during a year in which either of the following occurs:(a) The USDA Economic Research Service conducts a national household food security survey.(b) A federal agency conducts a food security survey that is a successor of, or similar to, the USDA Economic Research Service national household food security survey.